Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,145
Uncovered expenditures insolvency deposit; use.

The deposit required under section 44-32,144 shall be in trust and may be used only by the director for administrative costs associated with administering the deposit and payment of claims of enrollees of this state for uncovered expenditures. Claims for uncovered expenditures shall be paid on a pro rata basis based on assets available to pay such ultimate liability for incurred uncovered expenses. Partial distribution may be made pending final distribution. Any amount of the deposit remaining shall be paid into the liquidation or receivership of the health maintenance organization. The director may prescribe the time, manner, and form for filing claims under this section.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 54.